Hawaii statutes.
§431:22-103 Establishment of loss
mitigation grant program. The commissioner shall develop and implement a
pilot grant program to encourage the installation of wind resistive devices.
The commissioner may spend up to $6,000,000 over three years for the grant
program, which amounts shall include the costs of administering, operating, and
marketing the grant program.

For the first year of the grant program, the
commissioner may make grants only to former policyholders of the Hawaii
hurricane relief fund. From the second year onward, the commissioner may also
make grants to all single or multi-family residential owners, which may include
owners of townhouse units or condominium apartments under section
431:22-104(c)(3). [L 2002, c 179, pt of §3; am L 2011, c 124, §46]

Previous
Vol09_Ch0431-0435H
Next